California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 767, Sec. 3.   (SB 628)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative as prescribed in Section 14246.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14242.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “Act” means the California Creative Workforce Act of 2021

(b) “Board” means the California Workforce Development Board, established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 14010) of Chapter 3. 

(c) “Council” means the Arts Council established pursuant to Section 8751 of the Government Code. 

(d) “Creative work” means work directly relevant to the creation, development, production, and marketing of visual, performance, and literary art, including, but not limited to,
 painting, muralmaking, photography, music, performance art, acting, filmmaking, dancing, fashion design, graphic design, poetry, and all other forms of creative writing. 

(e) “Creative workers” means visual, performance, and literary artists, including, but not limited to, painters, muralists, photographers, musicians, performing artists, actors, filmmakers, dancers, fashion designers, graphic designers, poets, and writers. 

(f) “Earn and learn” has the meaning provided by subdivision (q) of Section 14005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 767, Sec. 3.   (SB 628)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative as prescribed in Section 14246.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14243.

(a) The council, in consultation with the board, shall design a grant program that meets the objectives enumerated in Section 14241. 

(b) The council shall consult with local governments, and community nonprofit organizations, educational institutions with arts programming, and workers, unions, and employers in relevant industry sectors on the design of the grant program. 

(c) Consistent with this chapter, the council shall adopt criteria, guidelines, and policies for the grant program. 

(1) The criteria guidelines, and policies shall be
 exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(2) The council shall make the criteria, guidelines, and policies available to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 767, Sec. 3.   (SB 628)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative as prescribed in Section 14246.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14244.

(a) The council, in consultation with the board, shall oversee and administer the grant program, which shall be operated and implemented locally or regionally by program grantees, including, but not limited to, local government entities, cultural arts agencies, community nonprofit organizations, and other organizations operating a program that is consistent with the objectives enumerated in Section 14241. 

(b) The council shall specify and set aside a portion of program funds to be awarded to grantees to provide, either directly or through contract, earn and learn job training employment opportunities for students who have enrolled or completed a program in the
 arts, low-income or unemployed creative workers, and others with a demonstrated interest in, or commitment to, creative work in their communities. 

(1) Grantees awarded funds under this subdivision may serve as, or contract with, labor market intermediaries who will connect prospective program participants to employers with earn and learn job training employment opportunities that involve creative work. 

(2) Earn and learn job training employment opportunities for a creative worker shall be for a period of no less than 12 months and no more than 24 months.

(3) Employment funded by the program shall pay a living wage in the regional labor market where the work is performed.

(4) Creative workers shall be employed in jobs that provide opportunities, over the course of their enrollment in the program, to learn occupational skills relevant to jobs characteristic of the arts and entertainment industry.

(5) Employment shall support creative workers in diverse projects, including, but not limited to, public artworks, musical and theatrical performances, and community documentation projects that lift up the voices of systemically marginalized populations and that reframe and reimagine the possibilities of defining a new California culture. 

(6) The program shall be structured so as to promote transition to unsubsidized employment at the time participants complete enrollment, with job placement in a living wage job serving as an important
 underlying objective of the program. 

(c) The council shall specify and set aside a portion of program funds to be awarded to grantees to create equitable opportunities for career exploration and participation in creative work for individuals and communities who have faced barriers to participation and employment in creative work as a result of low levels of public and private investment in the arts, limited exposure to arts programming, or other social or economic barriers to participation and employment in creative work. These efforts shall include providing grants to organizations serving veterans and individuals with employment barriers, as defined by subdivision (j) of Section 14005. 

(d) The council, in consultation with the board, may specify and set aside a portion of
 program funds to be awarded to grantees to provide other workforce services permitted under this division to unemployed, underemployed, and displaced creative workers. 

(e) (1) The council, in consultation with the board, shall develop and implement a plan for grant program evaluation and shall specify the data to be collected to evaluate program efficacy, including all of the following: 

(A) Data pertaining to the demographic characteristics of program participants. 

(B) Data pertaining to employment barriers of individual program participants. 

(C) Data pertaining to the types of earn and learn job training programs in which
 participants enroll.

(D) Data pertaining to any workforce services received during the period of program participation. 

(E) Data pertaining to outcomes, including labor market data, regarding the wages and employment of program participants after they exit the program. 

(2) The council shall require grantees, as a condition of receiving funding, to collect and remit all requisite data necessary to conduct program evaluation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 767, Sec. 3.   (SB 628)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative as prescribed in Section 14246.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14246.

This article shall become operative upon the appropriation by the Legislature of sufficient funds for its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 767, Sec. 3.   (SB 628)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative as prescribed by its own provisions.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Educational Services [14500. - 14530.]

14500.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when a person using his or her Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act individual training account enrolls in an adult education program, a noncredit curricula program at a community college, or a regional occupational center or program, for which state funds are allocated, all of the following shall apply:

(a) The entities administering the program may use Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act individual training account funds only to increase the number of hours of services provided above their adult block entitlement pursuant to Section 52616 of the Education Code and funding limit for regional occupational center programs for the purpose of enhancing
 services already supported with state funds. Any state funds provided to these entities above their adult block entitlements and funding limit for regional occupational center programs shall be subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(b) Any state funds allocated to the entity administering the program shall not be offset with the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act individual training account funds.

(c) The entity administering the program shall use the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act individual training account funds received for the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 43.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14510.

To the extent permitted by federal law, school districts and county offices of education are eligible to apply to local workforce development boards to provide basic skills training and skills necessary for attaining a secondary school diploma.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 44.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14530.

To the extent permissible under federal law, the Governor may set aside a portion of the youth funding specifically for programs to improve the academic skills of low-achieving youth and for dropout prevention activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 641, Sec. 23.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2018.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.1. Community Economic Resilience Fund Program [14531. - 14531.]

14531.

(a) (1) There is hereby established within the Workforce Services Branch of the Employment Development Department, the Community Economic Resilience Fund Program, to build an equitable and sustainable economic recovery from the impacts of COVID-19 on California’s industries, workers, and communities, and to provide for the durability of that recovery by fostering long-term economic resilience in the overall transition to a carbon-neutral economy.

(2) The branch shall administer the Community Economic Resilience Fund Program. The program shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter.

(b) (1) The program shall be administered by the Labor and Workforce
 Development Agency, the Office of Planning and Research, and the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development. These three agencies shall be referred to as the Inter-Agency Leadership Team and shall jointly be responsible for planning, oversight, and decision-making, including, but not limited to all of the following:

(A) Identifying the geographic boundaries of regions in a way that prioritizes economic recovery and transition strategies and is consistent with other state definition of regional economic and labor markets.

(B) Creating program guidelines and evaluation metrics.

(C) Designing a competitive grant structure for CERF investments.

(D) Developing technical assistance and evaluation infrastructure.

(E) Tracking and reporting progress and deliverables.

(2) Program implementation shall be undertaken by the Workforce Services Branch of the Employment Development Department under the direction of the Inter-Agency Leadership Team. It is the intent of the Legislature that CERF be designed to build a more robust, sustainable, and equitable recovery across all sectors of California’s economy and to provide for the durability of that recovery by fostering long-term economic resilience in the overall transition to a carbon-neutral economy.

(3) The Inter-Agency Leadership Team, as established in paragraph (1), shall develop policies for grant funds distributed in this chapter that may fund regional programs and economic development strategies that directly complement state and federal infrastructure, climate, business, and
 workforce investments in multiple sectors, including housing, transportation, advanced energy, broadband, and natural resources, and connect, in each of those sectors, to any existing or emerging high road training partnerships. Policies and guidelines developed under this provision shall be made publicly available on the Labor and Workforce Development Agency’s internet website.

(4) (A) The Inter-Agency Leadership Team shall consist of the senior cabinet-level appointees, or their designees, representing the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, the Office of Planning and Research, and the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, with policy guidance from subject matter experts within those state entities.

(B) The Inter-Agency Leadership Team shall be supported administratively by the Office of Planning and Research. Administrative support
 shall include support for convenings, meetings, agendas, gathering, analyzing and communicating stakeholder input, and summarizing guidelines for solicitations and providing this policy guidance to the Workforce Services Branch. The Labor and Workforce Development Agency, the Office of Planning and Research, and the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall sign memoranda of understanding or inter-agency agreements for purposes of confirming each of their roles and responsibilities in the Interagency Leadership Team.

(c) (1) The program shall provide financial support to establish and support high road transition collaboratives in designing region- and industry-specific economic recovery and transition strategies. The program shall include a focus on macroeconomic impacts, such as the global COVID-19 pandemic, the global transition to carbon neutrality, or the western region of the United States’ acute
 vulnerability to climate change impacts.

(2) The program, through these collaboratives, shall support transparent and inclusive processes for shared problem solving to advance long-term prosperity and equity.

(3) The collaboratives shall work directly with the community capacity-building programs initially established by Chapter 377 of the Statutes of 2018, pursuant to Part 3.6 (commencing with Section 71130) of Division 34 of the Public Resources Code, to support active and equitable community engagement and other similar state-sponsored local and regional economic, workforce, and community development programs and initiatives. The collaboratives shall also seek out and invite into the engagement process local and regional planning efforts whose mission is aligned with the purposes of this chapter.

(4) The
 representation on the collaboratives shall reflect the people and economy of the region and include balanced representation from labor, business, community, government, and other stakeholders, including, but not limited to, economic development, philanthropy, education, and workforce partners to be designated in the program guidelines.

(d) Planning grants shall be awarded on a competitive basis to establish and support at least one High Road Transition Collaborative per region in areas that have had disproportionate impacts due to COVID-19. The Inter-Agency Leadership Team shall establish evaluation criteria consistent with the state planning priorities established pursuant to Section 65041.1 of the Government Code. The Inter-Agency Leadership Team shall establish additional criteria and detailed metrics in the program guidelines, consistent with the goals of the program outlined in subdivisions (b) and (c), including the following core
 activities:

(1) Select a skilled and impartial convener to build a collaborative, as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (i), and facilitate and collaborate with each designated partner entity to develop the economic recovery and transition plans, to solicit, consider, and respond to comments from collaborative members, and to provide equitable public participation and input.

(2) Develop one or more regional and subregional economic recovery and transition plans addressing essential elements of a high road strategy, including economic diversification, industry planning, workforce development, career pathways for individuals with formal education totaling less than a two-year degree that lead to high road jobs, and the identification and integration of current or supplemental safety net programs. This plan shall include industry cluster and labor market analysis, with
 actionable research and consultation from the University of California or other expert institutions, and focus on economic recovery, growth, and resilience across multiple sectors. The plans shall prioritize the creation of high-quality jobs and equitable access to them, and emphasize where possible the development of sustainable and resilient industries, such as renewable energy, energy efficiency, carbon removal, and zero-emission vehicles, advanced manufacturing, agriculture and forestry, and climate restoration and resilience.

(3) Disseminate these transition plans to all interested parties. The plan or plans provided by each high road transition collaborative shall be made publicly available on the Labor and Workforce Development Agency’s internet website.

(e) (1) Implementation grants shall be awarded on a rolling and competitive basis. This grant
 program shall be structured to provide a small initial tranche of funding for economic diversification pilots with demonstrable high road elements in those regions already engaged in economic recovery and transition planning. The majority of funds shall be used to provide, through June 30, 2028, economic development grants on a rolling basis, informed by the work of high road transition collaboratives.

(2) The grant recipients shall demonstrate a plan to fully spend or obligate by June 30, 2028, all funds received pursuant to this subdivision, and shall pay all obligations by June 30, 2030.

(3) The implementation grants shall also meet all of the following requirements:

(A) Support work identified as a priority in the economic recovery and transition plan with the high road intent of this program.

(B) Demonstrate support of the regional intermediary and alignment with the economic recovery and transition plan.

(C) Support labor standards where applicable, such as prevailing wage, project labor agreements, or community workforce agreements.

(D) Address geographic equity, accounting for differences in urban, suburban, rural, and tribal communities, and emphasize investment in underserved jurisdictions.

(E) Organize strategies by industry or geography, or both, within and across regions, with the potential to focus on regionwide strategies or on one or more specific priority projects within a region.

(F) Include a range of activities related to economic diversification, including, but not limited to, creating innovation hubs for key growth industries, expanding incubator or accelerator programs that provide technical assistance for small business owners to connect to larger industry clusters, and other projects
 and activities that advance a high road economy.

(G) Coordinate with, advance, and complement, without supplanting, state and federal infrastructure investments.

(H) Align with regional workforce needs by linking directly to high road training partnerships or high road construction careers training programs wherever such partnerships exist or emerge in the region.

(f) The Labor and Workforce Development Agency, working with the Office of Planning and Research, and the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, shall manage the design and operation of all program solicitation and award processes, including the administration of and accountability for both the planning and implementation grants. The Workforce Services Branch shall manage funds and contracts under direction of the Inter-Agency Leadership
 Team. This includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Solicitation, management and execution of all grants and contracts, based on guidelines developed by the Inter-Agency Leadership Team.

(2) Oversight and monitoring for fiscal integrity.

(3) Quarterly reporting to the Inter-Agency Leadership Team.

(4) Beginning December 31, 2022, annual reporting to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the applicable Senate and Assembly budget subcommittees. The report shall include a detailed summary of grants awarded, fiscal compliance, and progress on individual program objectives and related high road metrics, including equity, inclusivity, job quality, and sustainability, as designated in program guidelines and determined by inter-agency
 program staff.

(5) Commencing June 30, 2023, supplemental annual reporting to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, that includes a concise written discussion, based on the experience and expertise of the Inter-Agency Leadership Team and program staff, describing key findings on regional trends in sustainable economic recovery, and common challenges in the development and implementation of high road transition strategies.

(6) Procurement of a comprehensive third-party evaluation to be completed, with guidance and oversight from the Inter-Agency Leadership Team, no less than six months after all available outcome data is available.

(g) All CERF grantees shall fulfill the outcome and reporting requirements required by this chapter as established by the Inter-Agency Leadership Team and
 fiscal oversight by the Employment Development Department. In addition to and in alignment with paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (f), these reporting requirements shall include:

(1) A detailed analysis of grantee challenges and achievements, whether relating to convening an inclusive regional planning process, developing a comprehensive high road recovery plan, or implementing a strategy to promote long-term economic resilience within the region and to create high road jobs, while transitioning to a carbon-neutral economy. This shall include measurable progress toward target outcomes, including job creation, increase in number of jobs per region, average increases in hourly wages of entered employed individuals placed in jobs, job retention, number of individuals impacted through services, such as training, supportive services, or job placement, as enumerated in CERF guidelines and individual contracts in accord with each of the above
 jurisdictions.

(2) A more general discussion of the challenges and opportunities of designing and implementing a high road transition vision in a particular place or industry. At a minimum, grantees shall report the number and types of stakeholders directly involved in CERF planning or project development, the nature and extent of their participation, and related efforts to build capacity among community, labor, local government, or other key stakeholder groups.

(h) A portion of grant funding may be reserved for making planning and implementation grants to Native American tribes under criteria and conditions determined by the Inter-Agency Leadership Team and consistent with the purposes of the program. Tribes are intended to have maximum flexibility in the use of the funds and to use the funds to support tribe-led economic development projects. Applying for grant funds that are
 awarded pursuant to this subdivision does not preclude a tribal government or group of tribal governments from applying for other implementation grants awarded pursuant to this section.

(i) For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) “CERF” shall mean the Community Economic Resilience Fund Program.

(2) “High road” has the same meaning as used in subdivision (r) of Section 14005.

(3) “High road construction careers” has the same meaning as used in subdivision (t) of Section 14005.

(4) “High road transition collaboratives” or “collaboratives” are broad-based regional groups convened by a skilled and impartial intermediary to plan for economic recovery and
 transition to a sustainable and equitable economic future. These collaboratives shall prioritize equity, sustainability, and job quality, and advance a shared prosperity where workers and communities across California’s diverse regions share equally in the benefits of a carbon-neutral future. Minimum membership and representation shall be as described in subdivision (c).

(5) “High road training partnerships” has the same meaning as used in subdivision (s) in Section 14005.

(j) Until July 1, 2025, the administering agency may authorize advance payments on a grant awarded under this section in accordance with Section 11019.1 of the Government Code.

(k) All criteria, guidelines, and policies developed for the administration of the program shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act
 (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(l) This chapter shall become operative when an appropriation is made by the Legislature for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The branch shall post notice of the appropriation on the home page of its internet website and send notice of the appropriation to the Legislative Counsel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 52, Sec. 29.   (AB 171)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.    See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 8. CALIFORNIA GREEN COLLAR JOBS ACT OF 2008 [15000. - 15003.]

15000.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Green Collar Jobs Act of 2008.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 312, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

15001.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The State of California has long been a national and international leader on environmental, natural resource, pollution prevention, and energy issues, as well as recent landmark laws in the areas of climate change, renewable energy, energy efficiency, and alternative transportation fuels.

(2) The passage of these laws has resulted in billions of dollars of investment capital flowing into the State of California for research, development, and commercialization of new green and clean technologies. This investment of capital is indicative of the rapidly
 growing clean and green technology sector of the California economy.

(3) California’s green economy is about the potential of new technologies combined with innovative public policy and strategic investments to stimulate the growth of new markets for green products and services.

(4) As the green economy grows, it will be accompanied by an increased demand for a highly skilled and well-trained “green collar” workforce.

(5) California state government must act promptly to build the partnerships, expand the programs, and secure the resources necessary to meet our green workforce needs. This effort must involve both our K–12 and higher education systems, labor unions, the environmental community, workforce development programs, nongovernmental organizations, philanthropy, and private sector industries.

(6) In acknowledgment of the tremendous size of California’s economy and related infrastructure, the application of sector strategies in a wide variety of industry sectors is essential to providing labor for industry and career paths for current and potential employees. The California Workforce Investment Board shall adopt a sector strategy approach in responding to industry sector workforce and economic development needs. This strategy will ensure industry has a qualified workforce and can offer opportunities for employment, training, and career advancement for all Californians. The initial drive of this sector strategy approach will be the California Green Collar Jobs Act of 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 31, Sec. 19.   (AB 119)   Effective June 29, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

15002.

(a) The California Workforce Investment Board (CWIB) shall establish a special committee known as the Green Collar Jobs Council (GCJC), comprised of the appropriate representatives from the CWIB existing membership, including the K–12 representative, the California Community Colleges representative, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development representative, the Employment Development Department representative, and other appropriate members. The GCJC may consult with other state agencies, other higher education representatives, local workforce investment boards, and industry representatives as well as philanthropic, nongovernmental, and environmental groups, as appropriate, in the development of a strategic initiative. To the extent private funds are available, is the
 intent of the Legislature that the GCJC will develop an annual award for outstanding achievement for workforce training programs operated by local or state agencies, businesses, or nongovernment organizations to be named after Parrish R. Collins.

(b) As part of the strategic initiative, the GCJC shall focus on developing the framework, funding, strategies, programs, policies, partnerships, and opportunities necessary to address the growing need for a highly skilled and well-trained workforce to meet the needs of California’s emerging green economy. The GCJC shall do all of the following:

(1) Assist in identifying and linking green collar job opportunities with workforce development training opportunities in local workforce investment areas (LWIAs), encouraging regional collaboration among LWIAs to meet regional economic demands.

(2) Align workforce development activities with regional economic recovery and growth strategies.

(3) Develop public, private, philanthropic, and nongovernmental partnerships to build and expand the state’s workforce development programs, network, and infrastructure.

(4) Provide policy guidance for job training programs for the clean and green technology sectors to help them prepare specific populations, such as at-risk youth, displaced workers, veterans, formerly incarcerated individuals, and others facing barriers to employment.

(5) Develop, collect, analyze, and distribute statewide and regional labor market data on California’s new and emerging green industries workforce needs, trends, and job growth.

(6) Collaborate with community
 colleges and other educational institutions, registered apprenticeship programs, business and labor organizations, and community-based and philanthropic organizations to align workforce development services with strategies for regional economic growth.

(7) Identify funding resources and make recommendations on how to expand and leverage these funds.

(8) Foster regional collaboratives in the green economic sector.

(c) The CWIB may accept any revenues, moneys, grants, goods, or services from federal and state entities, philanthropic organizations, and other sources, to be used for purposes relating to the administration and implementation of the strategic initiative, as described in subdivision (b). The CWIB shall also ensure the highest level of transparency and accountability and make information available on the
 CWIB Internet Web site.

(d) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the department may expend the moneys and revenues received pursuant to subdivision (c) for purposes related to the administration and implementation of the strategic initiative, and for the award of workforce training grants implementing the strategic initiative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 353, Sec. 128.   (SB 820)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 129 of Ch. 353.)
-------------------------------------------

15003.

(a) On or before April 1, 2011, and annually each April 1 thereafter, the CWIB shall report to the Legislature on the status of GCJC activities, grants awarded, and its development and implementation of a green workforce strategic initiative.

(b) The GCJC shall also consult with the appropriate state and local agencies to identify opportunities to coordinate the award of grant and green workforce training funds received by the state under the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) or any other funding sources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 396, Sec. 2.   (AB 2696)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 9. CALWORKS PROGRAM:  JOB CREATION [17000. - 17002.]

17000.

As used in this division “department” means the Employment Development Department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 29.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

17001.

Consistent with the ongoing relationships that the department maintains with private sector employers, the department shall encourage and organize the involvement of private sector employers and other community leaders in creating the necessary jobs for recipients of aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to move from welfare into unsubsidized employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 29.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

17002.

In carrying out the provisions of this division, the department shall conduct activities including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Establish a council of corporate executives consisting of 13 members drawn from the business community including, but not limited to, retired or former chief executive officers of major California corporations. Seven members shall be appointed by the Governor, three shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and three shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly. Appointments shall be made no later than January 31, 1998. This council shall provide ongoing advice and assistance to the department in recruiting private employers to hire recipients of aid.

(b) In consultation with the council described in subdivision (a), establish a clearinghouse for information on the Internet or other forms of toll-free communication for private sector employers to obtain information about assistance and resources for hiring CalWORKs recipients and to register their pledges to assist the state in finding the jobs necessary to meet the local welfare-to-work goals throughout the state.

(c) In consultation with the council described in subdivision (a), provide a forum for leaders in the faith-based communities, as well as other civic leaders, to assist the state in promoting welfare-to-work goals as part of the civic duty of their constituents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 223.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10. EMPLOYMENT ASSISTANCE FOR WORKERS WITH DISABILITIES [18000. - 18012.]

18000.

(a) It is the purpose of this division to ensure that workforce preparation services provided through California’s one-stop centers, including information and services provided electronically, are accessible to employers and jobseekers with disabilities.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that one-stop centers provide appropriate services to individuals with disabilities to enhance their employability.

(c) It is further the intent of the Legislature that, in order to achieve the goals specified in subdivisions (a) and (b), local workforce investment boards plan for and report on services to jobseekers and employers with disabilities, including the implementation of the federal Ticket to Work program for those local workforce investment boards and one-stop centers that choose to implement the Ticket to Work program in their local workforce investment areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1088, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

18002.

Each local workforce investment board shall establish at least one comprehensive one-stop career center in each local workforce investment area. These one-stop centers shall ensure access to services pursuant to Section 134(d) of the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2864(d)), including services for persons with disabilities, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Outreach, intake, and orientation.

(b) Initial assessments of skills, aptitudes, abilities, and need for support services.

(c) Program eligibility determinations.

(d) Information on the local, regional, and national labor market.

(e) Information on filing for unemployment insurance.

(f) Access to intensive services as needed, including, but not limited to, comprehensive and specialized assessments of skill levels and service needs, development of individual employment plans, group counseling, individual counseling and career planning, case management for participants seeking training services under subdivision (g), and short-term prevocational services, such as learning, communication, interview, and other jobseeking and work related skills to help prepare individuals for unsubsidized employment and training.

(g) Training services, including, but not limited to, occupational skills training, on-the-job training, workplace training and cooperative education programs, private sector training programs, skills upgrade and retraining, entrepreneurial training, job readiness training, adult education, and literacy activities combined with training, and customized training.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1088, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

18004.

The local workforce investment boards shall schedule and conduct regular performance reviews of their one-stop centers to determine whether the centers and providers are providing effective and meaningful opportunities for persons with disabilities to participate in the programs and activities of the centers and providers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1088, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

18006.

One-stop center counselor staff shall provide accurate information to beneficiaries of Supplemental Security Income and the State Supplemental Program and Social Security Disability Insurance on the implications of work for these individuals. The information shall include, but not be limited to, referrals to appropriate benefits’ planners. One-stop center counselor staff shall also provide accurate information to individuals with disabilities on how they may gain access to Medi-Cal benefits pursuant to Section 14007.9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1088, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

18008.

In order to ensure that one-stop career centers operated by local workforce investment boards meet the needs of workers and employers with disabilities, the Governor shall ensure that evaluations conducted pursuant to Sections 134 (a)(2)(B)(ii) and (v) of the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2864(a)(2)(B)(ii) and (v)), address how local one-stop centers provide all of the following:

(a) Full access to workforce development services for their disabled community.

(b) Assistive technology to ensure access to services.

(c) Staff training on assessment and service strategies for jobseekers and employers with disabilities.
